Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 280.1 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No executive branch agency shall increase the salary of a
state employee by more than ten percent (10%) with respect to any
fiscal year unless the cabinet secretary with jurisdiction over the
agency formally approves such increase. The Office of Management
and Enterprise Services shall prescribe a form to be used by a
cabinet secretary and at least one copy of the approval shall be
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3024 Page 1

reta ined by the agency providing the salary increase and one copy
shall be retained by the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services.
B. The maximum bonus amount that any state agency may provide
any state employee shall be ten percent (10%) of the base salary
amount in effect for the employee as of the original hire date for
the employee or as of the anniversary of such original hire date for
an employee with service in excess of one (1) fiscal year. The
Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall prescribe a form
to be used by executive branch agencies for the approval of a bonus
amount authorized by this subsection.
C. Each state agency shall establish, pursuant to permanent
administrative rules, a maximum authorized bonus amount for each
employee position within the agency and shall also establish metrics
or other performance measures with respect to each such employee
position or job category which shall either already be in effect as
of the date the bonus becomes effective or which shall take effect
not later than thirty (30) days after the employee is hired.
D. Salary adjustments for all employees performing services for
an executive branch agency in excess of ten percent (10%) may be
authorized as a result of performance reviews, a change in job
duties or titles or based on substantial modification of existing
duties and responsibilities which shall be documented by the agency

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3024 Page 2

usin g a form prescribed for such purpose by the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services.
E. The provisions of subsection A and subsection B of this
section shall not be applicable to the executive director or other
chief executive officers of an agency. Such positions shall be
subject to rules established by the agency on pay, bonuses and
raises pursuant to subsection C of this section.
F. The provisions of subsection A and subsection B of this
section shall not be applicable to job positions or categories
requiring advanced degrees or licensing or accreditation including,
but not limited to, medical doctors, certified public accountants,
and professional engineers. Such positions shall not be subject to
the provisions of subsection A or subsection B of this section.
Such positions shall be subject to rules established by their
employing agency on pay, bonus and raises pursuant to subsection C
of this section.
G. The provisions of subsection A and subsection B of this
section shall not be applicable to wholly non-appropriated state
agencies or their employees. Wholly non-appropriated state agencies
shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of this section.
Such agencies shall remain subject to the pay movement mechanisms
listed in subsection B of Section 840-2.17 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. Salary increases or bonuses exceeding ten
percent (10%) received by any employee of an agency governed by this
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3024 Page 3

subs ection shall be documented by the agency on a form prescribed
for such purpose by the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services. At least one copy shall be retained by the agency
providing the salary increase or bonus and one copy shall be
retained by the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
H. The provisions of subsection A and subsection B of this
section shall not be applicable to the employees of institutions
within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, employees of
any career technology district or to employees of any common school
district. The provisions of subsection A and subsection B of this
section shall be applicable to employees of the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 3024 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 3024 Page 5